Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2653
Duties and responsibilities of department; subject to appropriation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Pesticide Act, the duties and responsibilities of the department under the act shall be subject to adequate federal, cash, and general funding appropriation being made by the Legislature. If adequate funds are not made available under the act, the department shall submit a revised state pesticide plan to the federal agency outlining the current program.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 32.